Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Law reviews.

-
For article discussing important cases applying natural resource and game and fish law in 1976 and 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 131 (1977).
For comment, "The Right to Rainwater: An Unlikely Fairy Tale," see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 575 (2018).

12-2-1. Department created; commissioner of natural resources; affirmation of board decision by operation of law; appellate review.

There is created a Department of Natural Resources.

There is created the position of commissioner of natural resources. The commissioner shall be both appointed and removed by the Board of Natural Resources subject to approval of the Governor. Subject to the general policy established by the Board of Natural Resources, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the Department of Natural Resources by this article.

The commissioner may delegate to any person in the Department of Natural Resources the power to be present and participate, including the power to vote as his or her representative or substitute, at any meeting, hearing, or other proceeding of any association, authority, committee, board, or other body upon which the commissioner serves pursuant to this title.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, when a petition for judicial review of a final decision of the Board of Natural Resources in any matter arising under this title is filed pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," if the superior court in which the petition for review is filed does not hear the case within 90 days from the date the petition for review is filed with the court, the final decision of the board shall be considered affirmed by operation of law unless a hearing originally scheduled to be heard within the 90 days has been continued to a date certain by order of the court. In the event a hearing is held later than 90 days after the date the petition for review is filed with the superior court because a hearing originally scheduled to be heard within the 90 days has been continued to a date certain by order of the court, the final decision of the board shall be considered affirmed by operation of law if no order of the court disposing of the issues presented for review has been entered within 30 days after the date of the continued hearing. If a case is heard within 90 days from the date the petition for review is filed, the final decision of the board shall be considered affirmed by operation of law if no order of the court dispositive of the issues presented for review has been entered within 30 days of the date of the hearing.

A decision of the board affirmed by operation of law under subsection (c) of this Code section shall be subject to appellate review in the same manner as a decision of the superior court. The date of entry of judgment for purposes of appeal pursuant to Code Section 5-6-35 of a decision affirmed by operation of law without action of the superior court shall be the last date on which the superior court could have taken action under subsection (c) of this Code section. Upon the setting aside of any such decision of the board, the court may recommit the controversy to the board for further hearing or proceedings in conformity with the judgment and opinion of the court; or such court may enter the proper judgment upon the findings, as the nature of the case may demand. Such decree of the court shall have the same effect and all proceedings in relation thereto shall, subject to the other provisions of this chapter, thereafter be the same as though rendered in an action heard and determined by the court.

(Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 192, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 19, 21, 25; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, §§ 1, 4, 5, 9; Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, §§ 1, 2, 14; Ga. L. 1943, p. 180, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, §§ 1, 2, 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1501-1504, 1527; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1465, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 223, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 1.)

12-2-2. Environmental Protection Division; Environmental Advisory Council; duties of council and its members and director; appeal procedures generally; permit applications; inspections.

There is created within the Department of Natural Resources an Environmental Protection Division.

The division shall have a director who shall be both appointed and removed by the Board of Natural Resources with the approval of the Governor. The director shall appoint an assistant director of the division. The director and the assistant director shall be qualified professionals, competent in the field of environmental protection. The director and the assistant director shall be in the unclassified service. In the event of a vacancy in the office of the director or in his absence or if he is disabled, the assistant director shall perform all the duties of the director. The director shall be responsible for enforcing the environmental protection laws of Georgia. The director shall hire the personnel for the division and shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, and execute the functions vested in the division.

The Governor shall appoint an Environmental Advisory Council. The council shall consist of 15 members who shall be representative of professional and lay individuals, organizations, and governmental agencies associated or involved with environmental matters. The term of each member of the council shall be for two years, provided that of the members first appointed, seven shall be appointed for terms of one year and eight for terms of two years. Vacancies shall be filled by similar appointment for unexpired terms.

The council shall advise the Governor, the board, and the director as to the efficacy of the state's environmental protection programs, the need for legislation relating to the environment, the need for expansion or reduction of specific environmental programs, and the need for specific changes in the state's environmental protection programs. The council may review and prepare written comments on proposed state plans and on standards, rules, and regulations proposed by the division. Such comments may be submitted to the director, the board, and any other individual or agency deemed appropriate.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall receive the same expense allowance as that received by members of the General Assembly and the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal car or a travel allowance of actual transportation cost if traveling by public carrier as that received by all other state officials and employees.

The director shall issue all orders and shall grant, deny, revoke, or amend all permits or variances provided for in the laws to be enforced by the division. The director shall also issue any certification which is required by any law of this state or the United States to be issued by the director, the Department of Natural Resources, or the State of Georgia relating to pollution control facilities or matters. The director shall develop and implement procedures for timely processing of applications made to the division for issuance or renewal of permits or variances, including but not limited to procedures for expedited review and granting of applications upon payment of a fee in an amount established by the director to offset the cost of expediting, all subject to compliance with requirements of law regarding such applications. Such procedures shall also provide any applicant who has applied to the division for issuance or renewal of a permit or variance with the ability to securely track the status of his or her application, with real time updates, via the division's Internet website. The director shall notify all permit or variance applicants within ten days of receipt of the application as to the completeness of the application and, if the director finds the same to be incomplete, what specific additional materials the applicant need submit to make the application complete. The director shall notify applicants within ten days of receipt of a completed application as to the name and address of the person assigned to perform the review and the date, time, and location of the application review. The director shall grant or deny any permit or variance within 90 days after receipt of all required application materials by the division, provided that the director may for any application order not more than one extension of time of not more than 60 days within which to grant or deny the permit or variance.

The director may identify professionals qualified to review certain permit applications in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board of the Department of Natural Resources.

A permit applicant may retain a qualified professional to review an application prior to submittal to the division. If the qualified professional certifies an application as complete, the division shall act expeditiously on the application.

A qualified professional certifying an application shall be independent of any professional preparing the application.

The applicant shall directly pay the fees of the qualified professional.

The director may remove the qualified status of a professional if the professional provides a certification for an inaccurate application.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the director shall, upon petition to the director within 30 days after the issuance of such order or the taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings assigned under Code Section 50-13-40 and acting in place of the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. Any administrative law judge so assigned shall fully meet and qualify as to all applicable conflict of interest requirements provided for in Section 304(h)(2)(D) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act of 1972, as amended, and the rules, regulations, and guidelines promulgated thereunder.

In any case involving the grant of a permit, permit amendment, or variance by the director, the filing of such a petition by a person to whom such order or action is not directed shall stay such order or action until such time as the hearing has been held and for ten days after the administrative law judge renders his or her decision on the matter. The petition shall be transmitted to the administrative law judge not more than seven days after the date of filing. The provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 50-13-41 notwithstanding, the hearing shall be held and the decision of the administrative law judge shall be rendered not later than 90 days after the date of the filing of the petition by such a person unless such period is extended for a time certain by order of the administrative law judge upon consent of all parties; in addition, the administrative law judge may extend the 90 day period for good cause shown for a period not to exceed an additional 60 days.

The provisions of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph notwithstanding, in any case involving the grant of a permit, permit amendment, or variance by the director regarding water withdrawal for farm uses under Code Section 12-5-31 or Code Section 12-5-105, the filing of a petition under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph by any person to whom such order or action is not directed shall not stay such order or action.

The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the director, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

Persons are "aggrieved or adversely affected," except as set forth in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, where the challenged action has caused or will cause them injury in fact and where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by the statutes that the director is empowered to administer and enforce. In the event the director asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on this issue before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner.

Persons are not aggrieved or adversely affected by the listing of property in the hazardous site inventory in accordance with Code Section 12-8-97 if such property was so listed prior to July 1, 2014, nor are persons aggrieved or adversely affected by an order of the director issued pursuant to Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 8 of this title, the "Georgia Hazardous Site Response Act," unless or until the director seeks to recover response costs, enforce the order, or recover a penalty for violation of such order; provided, however, that persons are aggrieved or adversely affected if the director designates property as needing corrective action pursuant to paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-97. Any person aggrieved or adversely affected by any such listing occurring after July 1, 2014, or any such designation shall be entitled to a hearing as provided in Code Section 12-8-73.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in seeking civil penalties for the violation of those laws to be enforced by the division and where the imposition of such penalties is provided for therein, the director upon written request may cause a hearing to be conducted before an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources for the purpose of determining whether such civil penalties should be imposed in accordance with the law there involved. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the director, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for purposes of establishing criminal violations of the standards, rules, and regulations promulgated by the Board of Natural Resources as provided in this title, the term "standards, rules, and regulations" shall mean those standards, rules, and regulations of the Board of Natural Resources in force and effect on January 1, 2016.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever the division determines that a violation of any provision of this title or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this title relating to those laws to be enforced by the division has occurred, the division shall be required to attempt by conference, conciliation, or persuasion to convince the violator to cease such violation. If the director finds that the public health, safety, or welfare requires emergency action and incorporates a finding to that effect in his or her order, such order may summarily provide for the immediate cessation of any activity constituting such violation. Whether negotiated or directed, such order shall specify the alleged violation and shall prescribe a reasonable time for corrective action to be accomplished. Any order issued pursuant to this subsection shall become final unless the person aggrieved requests a hearing in writing before the director not later than 30 days after such order is served.

Whenever the Constitution and laws of the United States or the State of Georgia require the issuance of a warrant to make an inspection under any law administered by the director, the procedure set forth in paragraphs (1) through (7) of this subsection shall be employed.

The director or any person authorized to make inspections for the division shall make application for an inspection warrant to a person who is a judicial officer within the meaning of Code Section 17-5-21.

An inspection warrant shall be issued only upon cause and when supported by an affidavit particularly describing the place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for which the inspection is to be made. In addition, the affidavit shall contain either a statement that consent to inspect has been sought and refused or facts or circumstances reasonably justifying the failure to seek such consent. Cause shall be deemed to exist if either reasonable legislative or administrative standards for conducting a routine or area inspection are satisfied with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle, or there is reason to believe that a condition of nonconformity exists with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle.

An inspection warrant shall be effective for the time specified therein, but not for a period of more than 14 days, unless extended or renewed by the judicial officer who signed and issued the original warrant, upon satisfying himself that such extension or renewal is in the public interest. Such inspection warrant must be executed and returned to the judicial officer by whom it was issued within the time specified in the warrant or within the extended or renewed time. After the expiration of such time, the warrant, unless executed, is void.

An inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant shall be made between 8:00 A.M. and 6:00 P.M. of any day or at any time during operating or regular business hours. An inspection should not be performed in the absence of an owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle unless specifically authorized by the judicial officer upon a showing that such authority is reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose of the regulation being enforced. An inspection pursuant to a warrant shall not be made by means of forcible entry, except that the judicial officer may expressly authorize a forcible entry where facts are shown which are sufficient to create a reasonable suspicion of a violation of this title, which, if such violation existed, would be an immediate threat to health or safety, or where facts are shown establishing that reasonable attempts to serve a previous warrant have been unsuccessful. Where prior consent has been sought and refused and a warrant has been issued, the warrant may be executed without further notice to the owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.

It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to allow an inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant issued as provided in this subsection. Any person violating this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Under this subsection, an inspection warrant is an order, in writing, signed by a judicial officer, directed to the director or any person authorized to make inspections for the division, and commanding him or her to conduct any inspection required or authorized by this title or regulations promulgated pursuant to this title.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require an inspection warrant when a warrantless inspection is authorized by law or a permit issued under this title.

Where this title does not otherwise specify the disposition of moneys collected by the division pursuant to an order issued by the director or the disposition of civil penalties collected by the division, such moneys and civil penalties shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund but shall be available for appropriation by the General Assembly to the department for inclusion in the hazardous waste trust fund continued in existence by subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-95 in keeping with the legislative intent expressed in subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-91.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 17, 1534; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1266, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 344, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 838, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1465, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1738, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 319, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 818, § 1/SB 190; Ga. L. 2006, p. 237, § 1/SB 191; Ga. L. 2007, p. 127, § 1/HB 463; Ga. L. 2012, p. 622, § 1/SB 427; Ga. L. 2013, p. 171, § 3/HB 320; Ga. L. 2013, p. 274, § 6/HB 226; Ga. L. 2014, p. 817, § 1/SB 333; Ga. L. 2014, p. 819, § 1/HB 904; Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 1/HB 840.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "Act," was substituted for "Act" in paragraphs (c)(2) and (c)(4).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2000, p. 877,

§

2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall apply with respect to applications pending on July 1, 2000, as well as applications submitted on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 432,

§

6/HB 840, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2016, and shall apply to all offenses occurring on or after such date."

Law reviews.

-
For article, "State Administrative Agency Contested Case Hearings," see 24 Ga. St. B.J. 193 (1988). For article, "From Marshes to Mountains, Wetlands Come Under State Regulation," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 865 (1990). For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015).
For note on 1993 amendment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 55 (1993). For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 26 (2000).

12-2-3. Departmental purposes.

It shall be the objectives of the department:

To have the powers, duties, and authority formerly vested in the Division of Conservation and the commissioner of conservation;

By means of investigation, recommendation, and print or electronic publication, to aid:

In the promotion of the conservation and development of the natural resources of the state;

In promoting a more profitable use of lands and waters;

In promoting the development of commerce and industry; and

In coordinating existing scientific investigations with any related work of other agencies for the purpose of formulating and promoting sound policies of conservation and development;

To collect and classify the facts derived from such investigations and from the work of other agencies of the state as a source of information accessible to the citizens of the state and to the public generally, which facts set forth the natural, economic, industrial, and commercial advantages of the state; and

To establish and maintain perfect cooperation with any and every agency of the federal government interested in or dealing with the subject matter of the department.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 4; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388.)

12-2-4. Powers and duties of department.

The department shall make investigations of the natural mining industry and commercial resources of the state and shall take such measures as it may deem best suited to promote the conservation and development of such resources.

The department shall have the care of the state parks and other recreational areas now owned or to be acquired by the state.

Reserved.

The department shall make such examination, survey, and mapping of the geology, mineralogy, and topography of the state, including their industrial and economic utilization, as it may consider necessary.

The department shall make an investigation of the water supply and water power of the state with recommendations and plans for promoting their more profitable use and shall take such measures as it may consider necessary to promote their development.

The department shall make investigations of existing conditions of trade, commerce, and industry in the state, paying particular attention to the causes which may hinder or encourage their growth, and may devise and recommend such plans as may be considered best suited to promote the development of their interests.

The department may take such other measures as it may deem advisable to obtain and make public a more complete knowledge of the state and its resources, and it is authorized to cooperate with other departments and agencies of the state in obtaining and making public such information. It shall be the duty of the department to arrange and classify the facts derived from its investigations so as to provide a general source of information in regard to the state, its advantages, and its resources.

The department shall prepare a report to be submitted by the Governor to each General Assembly, showing the nature and progress of the department.

The department shall from time to time prepare for print or electronic publication reports and statements, with illustrations, maps, and other descriptions which adequately set forth the natural and material resources of the state and its industrial and commercial development, with a view toward furnishing information to educate the people regarding the material advantages of the state, to encourage and foster the existing industries, and to present inducements for investments in new enterprises. Such reports and information shall be published and distributed as the department may direct, at the expense of the state, as other public documents.

It is the intent and purpose, in creating the Department of Natural Resources, that the department shall confer with, cooperate with, and work in harmony with the Department of Economic Development on all new activities of the Department of Natural Resources.

The department shall without any fee therefor accept applications for certification of environmentally sensitive conservation use property or constructed storm water wetland conservation use property as provided for in Code Section 48-5-7.4 and shall certify property to local boards of tax assessors and to the applicable local governing authority as meeting or not meeting the criteria of such Code section.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 8; Ga. L. 1981, p. 838, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 12; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1903, § 12; Ga. L. 2003, p. 271, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 12/HB 95; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388.)

Cross references.

- Powers and duties of Environmental Protection Division as to mineral and geological resources,

§

12-4-1

.

Powers and duties of department relating to game and fish laws, T. 27.

Bona fide conservation use property,

§

48-5-7.4

.

Authority of department to convey property for purposes of constructing and operating boat-launching ramps thereon,

§

50-16-45

.

Powers and duties of department with regard to boat safety,

§

52-7-1

et seq.

Powers and duties of department with regard to river and harbor development, T. 52, C. 9.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641,

§

18, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "In the event of any substantive conflict between this Act and any other Act of the 1989 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1903,

§

14, effective April 24, 1991, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "To assist counties and boards of education in planning, volumes of standing timber harvested in each county through the last business day of the second and third quarters of 1991 shall be reported by the purchaser, or by the harvester if there is no purchaser, to the tax assessors of the county or counties in which the timber was harvested by November 15, 1991.
Such reports shall show the number of pounds, if available, or measured volume of softwood and hardwood pulpwood, chip and saw logs, saw timber, poles, posts, and fuel wood so harvested.
The commissioner, after consultation with the Georgia Forestry Commission, shall provide the tax assessor of each county with the weighted average unit price in pounds and measured volume paid through the last business day of such period for each such product class, no later than November 15, 1991."

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1903,

§

15, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall be applicable beginning January 1, 1992, with respect to ad valorem taxation of timber and shall be applicable beginning January 1, 1992, for all other purposes. Taxation for prior periods shall continue to be governed by prior law.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 271,

§

3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act to subsection (k) is applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972). For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 182 (1992).

12-2-5. Essential services for inhabitants of coastal islands authorized.

On the coastal islands of the State of Georgia, where there is no causeway or other means of land transportation and where essential services are not otherwise provided, the department is authorized to contract for or to provide essential services and water transportation for the employees of the department and their families, other state employees and their families, and any permanent residents of the islands. This authorization is applicable only to those islands owned or controlled by the State of Georgia and upon which the department has facilities located, or on other islands where an emergency condition is found to exist.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 866, § 1.)

12-2-6. Authority to arrange for and accept federal aid and cooperation; volunteer services; cooperation with other government entities and civic organizations; creation of nonprofit corporation.

In carrying out its objectives, the department is authorized to arrange for and accept such aid and cooperation from the several United States governmental bureaus and departments and from such other sources as may lend assistance.

The commissioner is authorized to accept the services of individuals without compensation as volunteers for or in aid of environmental protection, coastal resources, historic preservation, interpretive functions, hunter safety and boating safety instruction, hunter safety and boating safety programs, wildlife management, recreation, visitor services, conservation measures and development, public education on conservation, and any other activities in and related to the objectives, powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department.

The commissioner is authorized to provide for reimbursement of volunteers for incidental expenses such as transportation, uniforms, lodging, and subsistence. The commissioner is also authorized to provide general liability coverage and fidelity bond coverage for such volunteers while they are rendering service to or on behalf of the department.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a volunteer shall not be deemed to be a state employee and shall not be subject to the provisions of law relating to state employment, including, without limitation, those relating to hours of work, rates of compensation, leave, unemployment compensation, and state employee benefits.

Volunteers performing work under the terms of this Code section may be authorized by the department to operate state owned vehicles. They may also be treated as employees of the state for the purposes of inclusion in any automobile liability insurance or self-insurance, general liability insurance or self-insurance, or fidelity bond coverage provided by the department for its employees while operating state owned vehicles.

No volunteer shall be authorized or allowed to enter privately owned or operated lands, facilities, or properties without the express prior written permission of the owner or operator of such privately owned or operated lands, facilities, or properties; provided, however, that such prohibition shall not apply to lands, facilities, or properties leased to the State of Georgia.

The department shall have the power and authority to create, establish, and operate a program or programs to facilitate, amplify, or supplement the objectives and functions of the department through the use of volunteer services, including, but not limited to, the recruitment, training, and use of volunteers.

The department is directed to cooperate with and coordinate its work with the work of each department of the federal government dealing with the same subject matters dealt with by the Department of Natural Resources. The department is authorized to cooperate with the counties of the state in any surveys to ascertain the natural resources of the counties. The department is also authorized to cooperate with the governing bodies of municipalities and boards of trade and other local civic organizations in examining and locating water supplies and in giving advice concerning and in recommending plans for other municipal improvements and enterprises. Such cooperation is to be conducted upon such terms as the department may direct.

The department shall have the authority to participate with public and private groups, organizations, and businesses in joint advertising and promotional projects that promote environmental protection, coastal resource conservation, historic preservation, interpretive functions, hunter safety and boating safety instruction and programs, outdoor recreation, wildlife management, recreation, visitor services, conservation measures and development, public education on conservation, and any other activities in and related to the objectives, powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department and that make efficient use of funds appropriated for advertising and promotions; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to authorize the department to grant any donation or gratuity.

The department shall have the power and authority to incorporate one nonprofit corporation that could qualify as a public foundation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to aid the department in carrying out any of its powers and in accomplishing any of its purposes. Any nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this power shall be created pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 14, the "Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code," and the Secretary of State shall be authorized to accept such filing.

Any nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the following provisions:

In accordance with the Constitution of Georgia, no governmental functions or regulatory powers shall be conducted by any such nonprofit corporation;

Upon dissolution of any such nonprofit corporation incorporated by the department, any assets shall revert to the department or to any successor to the department or, failing such succession, to the State of Georgia;

The board of directors of any such nonprofit corporation shall always include three members of the Board of Natural Resources who shall serve as nonvoting members. Service by a member of the Board of Natural Resources as a nonvoting member of the board of directors of any such nonprofit corporation shall not constitute a conflict of interest. No member of the Board of Natural Resources shall be a voting member of the board of directors of any such nonprofit corporation;

As used in this subparagraph, the term "direct employee costs" means salary, benefits, and travel expenses. To avoid the appearance of undue influence on regulatory functions by donors, no donations to any such nonprofit corporation from private sources shall be used for direct employee costs of the department;

Any such nonprofit corporation shall be subject to all laws relating to open meetings and the inspection of public records;

The department shall not be liable for the action or omission to act of any such nonprofit corporation;

No debts, bonds, notes, or other obligations incurred by any such nonprofit corporation shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia nor shall any act of any such nonprofit corporation constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of the state. No holder or holders of any such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state nor to enforce the payment thereof against the state; and

Any nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this Code section shall not acquire or hold a fee simple interest in real property by any method, including but not limited to gift, purchase, condemnation, devise, court order, and exchange.

Any nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this subsection shall make public and provide an annual report showing the identity of all donors and the amount each person or entity donated as well as all expenditures or other disposal of money or property donated. Such report shall be provided to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment, the House Committee on Game, Fish, and Parks, and the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee. Any such nonprofit corporation shall also provide such persons with a copy of all corporate filings with the federal Internal Revenue Service.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2328, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1566, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 107, § 1/HB 1199; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-4/HB 642; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 269, § 1/HB 381.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,

§

3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act." This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,

§

3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90."

12-2-7. Duty to advise Governor on environmental matters.

The department shall have the duty of providing special counsel to the Governor concerning environmental matters affecting the state.

In providing counsel to the Governor on environmental matters, the department shall:

Advise the Governor on comprehensive environmental policy for the state;

Develop guidelines for balancing environmental quality with economic development;

Study and from time to time report to the Governor on environmental conditions and trends in the state;

Make or recommend such special environmental studies as it deems appropriate or desirable; and

Recommend environmental policies for improvement and maintenance of the quality of environmental conditions within the state.

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 788, §§ 1, 2.)